New York, session 2025-2026, A10805.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited the 2 "New York saves lives act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public health law is amended 4 by adding a new paragraph (t) to read as follows: 5 (t) Any resident of this state sixteen years and older may register to 6 save lives by signing up as an organ, eye and tissue donor through the 7 New York state donate life registry. 8 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 209-b to 9 read as follows: 10 § 209-b. New York state donate life registry option on applications 11 for admission to the state university of New York. 1. All applications 12 for admission to the state university of New York shall contain a space 13 for the applicant to register in the New York state donate life registry 14 for organ and tissue donations established pursuant to section forty- 15 three hundred ten of the public health law. 16 2. The chancellor of the state university of New York shall annually 17 report the number of applicants that elected to register in the New York 18 state donate life registry to the governor; the temporary president of 19 the senate; the speaker of the assembly; the minority leader of the 20 senate; and the minority leader of the assembly. 21 § 4. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6235 to read 22 as follows: 23 § 6235. New York state donate life registry option on applications for 24 admission to the city university of New York. 1. All applications for 25 admission to the city university of New York shall contain a space for 26 the applicant to register in the New York state donate life registry for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08719-01-5 A. 10805 2 1 organ and tissue donations established pursuant to section forty-three 2 hundred ten of the public health law. 3 2. The chancellor of the city university of New York shall annually 4 report the number of applicants that elected to register in the New York 5 state donate life registry to the governor; the temporary president of 6 the senate; the speaker of the assembly; the minority leader of the 7 senate; and the minority leader of the assembly. 8 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.